src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON LEPOT
+Sg1:lidtjav # ; 
+Sg2:lidtja # ; 
+Sg3:lidtj # ; 
+Du1:lidtjin # ; 
+Du2:lidtjabehtin # ; 
+Du3:lidtjaba # ; 
+Du3:lidtjaban # ; 
+Pl1:lidtjap # ;  
+Pl2:lidtjabihtit # ; 
+Pl3:lidtji # ; 


!LEXICON ATJA !!= * @CODE@ !!! originally in ACSj:  ATJA "skola" ;  !!= * @CODE@  ???
!atja+V+Ind+Prs: ATJAPRS ; 
!atja+V+Ind+Prt: ATJAPRT ; 
!
!
!LEXICON ATJAPRS !!= * @CODE@ 
!+Sg1:atjav      # ;  !!= * @CODE@ 
!+Sg2:atjah      # ; 
!+Sg3:atja       # ; 
!+Du1:itjin      # ; 
!+Du2:atjabihten # ; 
!+Du3:atjaba     # ; 
!+Pl1:atjap      # ; 
!+Pl2:atjabihtit # ; 
!+Pl3:itjih      # ; 
!
!LEXICON ATJAPRT !!= * @CODE@ 
!+Sg1:itjiv    # ;  !!= * @CODE@ 
!+Sg2:itjih    # ; 
!+Sg3:atjaj    # ; 
!+Du1:atjajmen # ; 
!+Du2:atjajden # ; 
!+Du3:atjajgan # ; 
!+Pl1:atjajmeh # ; 
!+Pl2:atjajdeh # ; 
!+Pl3:itjin    # ; 

LEXICON IJ !!= * @CODE@ 
!ij+V+Ind+Prs: IJPRS ;
!ij+V+Ind+Prt: IJPRT ;
!ij+V+Imprt: IJIMP ;
ij+V+Neg+Prs: IJPRS ;
ij+V+Neg+Prt: IJPRT ;
ij+V+Neg+Imprt: IJIMP ;

LEXICON IJPRS !!= * @CODE@ 
+Sg1:iv    # ;  !!= * @CODE@ 
+Sg2:i    # ; 
+Sg3:ij    # ; 
+Du1:en # ; 
+Du2:ehpen # ;   
+Du3:iebá # ; 
+Pl1:iehpe # ; 
+Pl1:ep # ; 
+Pl2:ehpit # ;  
+Pl3:ie   # ;
+Pl3:e   # ;

LEXICON IJPRT !!= * @CODE@ 
+Sg1:idtjiv    # ;  !!= * @CODE@ 
+Sg2:idtji    # ; 
+Sg3:idtjij    # ; 
+Du1:iejme # ; 
+Du1:idtjijmen # ; 
+Du2:iejde  # ; 
+Du2:idtjijden # ; 
+Du3:iejga # ; 
+Du3:idtjijga # ; 
+Pl1:iejme # ; 
+Pl1:idtjijme # ; 
+Pl2:iejde # ; 
+Pl2:idtjijde # ; 
+Pl3:idtjin    # ;


LEXICON IJIMP !!= * @CODE@ 
+Sg2:iele  # ; !!= * @CODE@ 
+Du2:iellen # ; 
+Du3:ellit  # ;


LEXICON 3DUPRS !variation in 3rd-DUAL-Presence suffixes for EVEN stems
:ba # ;
+Use/NG:ban # ;

LEXICON 3DUPRT !variation in 3rd-DUAL-Preterite suffixes for EVEN and CONTRACTED stems
:ga # ;
+Use/NG:gan # ;


!!!!!!!!! original verb LEXICA below (before JW)

!!! !!!Main verbs
!
!!LEXICON SLADDJIT
!!BÅHTET ;
!
!LEXICON ÅRROT !omljud framför u är ej inlagt, stadieväxlingen rr:r fungerar ej det blir rr i alla former
!+V:     ÅRROT_S ;
!+V:^WG ÅRROT_W ;
!
!LEXICON ÅRROT_S
!
!+Inf:o%>t # ; 
!+GerII:o%>min # ;
!+PrfPrc:u%>m # ;
!+PrsPrc:o # ; !extra starkt, hur få till det?
!+Imprt+Du2:o%>n # ; 
!+Imprt+Pl2:u%>t #;
!+Vsubst:%>om #; 
!
!+Ind+Prs+Sg3:u #;
!+Ind+Prs+Du1:u^IUML%>n #; 
!+Ind+Prs+Du2:o%>behtin #;
!+Ind+Prs+Du2:o%>bähtten #;
!+Ind+Prs+Du3:o%>ba #;
!+Ind+Prs+Pl1:o%>p #;
!+Ind+Prs+Pl2:o%>bihtit #;
!+Ind+Prs+Pl2:o%>behtit #;
!+Ind+Prs+Pl3:u^IUML #; 
!+Ind+Prt+Sg1:u^IUML%>v #; 
!+Ind+Prt+Sg2:u^IUML #; 
!+Ind+Prt+Pl3:u^IUML%>n #; 
!
!LEXICON ÅRROT_W
!+GerI:%>odin # ;  
!+Sup:%>otjit # ;
!+Neg:%>o # ; 
!+Pot:%>otj V_ODD_IND_PRS ; 
!+Imprt+Sg2:o #; 
!+Vgen:o #;  
!
!+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>ov #;
!+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>o #;
!+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>oj #;
!+Ind+Prt+Du1:%>ojmen #;
!+Ind+Prt+Du2:%>ojden #;
!+Ind+Prt+Du3:%>ojga #;
!+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>ojme #;
!+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>ojde #;
!
!LEXICON VESSOT
!ÅRROT ;
!
!LEXICON BALLAT
!+V:     BALLAT_S ;
!+V:a^WG BALLAT_W ;
!
!!LEXICON VADTSAAT
!!+V:     VADTSAAT_S ;
!!+V:^WG VADTSAAT_W ;
!!
!!LEXICON VADTSAAT_S
!!BALLAT_S ;
!!
!!LEXICON VADTSAAT_W
!!BALLAT_W ;
!
!
!LEXICON LÅHKÅT
!+V:     LÅHKÅT_S ;
!+V:^WG LÅHKÅT_W ;
!
!LEXICON LÅHKÅT_S 
!
!+Inf:å%>t # ; 
!+GerII:å%>min # ; 
!+PrfPrc:å%>m # ;
!+PrsPrc:e # ; !extra starkt, hur få till det? 
!+Imprt+Du2:e%>n # ; 
!+Imprt+Pl2:i%>t #;
!+Vsubst:%>åm #;  
!
!+Ind+Prs+Sg3:a #;
!+Ind+Prs+Sg3:á #;
!+Ind+Prs+Du1:i^IUML%>n #;
!+Ind+Prs+Du2:å%>behtin #;
!+Ind+Prs+Du2:å%>bähtten #;
!+Ind+Prs+Du3:å%>ba #;
!+Ind+Prs+Pl1:å%>p #;
!+Ind+Prs+Pl2:å%>bihtit #;
!+Ind+Prs+Pl2:å%>behtit #;
!+Ind+Prs+Pl3:i^IUML #;
!+Ind+Prt+Sg1:i^IUML%>v #;
!+Ind+Prt+Sg2:i^IUML #;
!+Ind+Prt+Pl3:i^IUML%>n #; 
!
!LEXICON LÅHKÅT_W !låg, svagstadium fungerar ej
!+GerI:%>ådin # ; 
!+Sup:%>åtjit # ;
!+Pot:%>åtj V_ODD_IND_PRS ; 
!+Imprt+Sg2:å #; 
!+Vgen:å #;
!+Neg:%>å # ;  
!
!+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>åv #;
!+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>å #;
!+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>åj #;
!+Ind+Prt+Du1:%>åjmen #;
!+Ind+Prt+Du2:%>åjden #;
!+Ind+Prt+Du3:%>åjga #;
!+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>åjme #;
!+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>åjde #;
!
!
!LEXICON BÅHTET
!+V:     BÅHTET_S ;
!+V:^WG BÅHTET_W ;
!
!LEXICON BÅHTET_S !omljud å till u fungerar ej
!+Inf:e%>t # ; 
!+GerII:e%>min # ;
!+PrfPrc:á%>m # ;
!+PrsPrc:e # ; !extra starkt, hur få till det? 
!+Imprt+Du2:e%>n # ; 
!+Imprt+Pl2:i%>t #;
!+Vsubst:%>em #; 
!
!+Ind+Prs+Sg3:a #;
!+Ind+Prs+Sg3:á #;
!+Ind+Prs+Du1:i^IUML%>n #;
!+Ind+Prs+Du2:e%>behtin #;
!+Ind+Prs+Du2:e%>bähtten #;
!+Ind+Prs+Du3:e%>ba #;
!+Ind+Prs+Pl1:e%>p #;
!+Ind+Prs+Pl2:e%>bihtit #;
!+Ind+Prs+Pl2:e%>behtit #;
!+Ind+Prs+Pl3:i^IUML #;
!+Ind+Prt+Sg1:i^IUML%>v #;
!+Ind+Prt+Sg2:i^IUML #;
!+Ind+Prt+Pl3:i^IUML%>n #; 
!
!LEXICON BÅHTET_W !båd svagstadium fungerar ej
!+GerI:%>edin # ; 
!+Sup:%>átjit # ;
!+Pot:%>itj V_ODD_IND_PRS ; 
!+Imprt+Sg2:e #; 
!+Vgen:e #;
!+Neg:%>e # ;  
!
!+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>áv #;
!+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>av #;
!+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>á #;
!+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>a #;
!+Ind+Prt+Sg3:i^IUML%>j #;
!+Ind+Prt+Du1:i^IUMjmen #;
!+Ind+Prt+Du2:i^IUMjden #;
!+Ind+Prt+Du3:i^IUMjga #;
!+Ind+Prt+Pl1:i^IUMjme #;
!+Ind+Prt+Pl2:i^IUMjde #;
!
!
!LEXICON V_CONTR_ORIG 
!+V+Inf:%>t # ; 
!+V+PrfPrc:%>m #;
!+PrsPrc:%>jäddje # ; 
!+V+GerII:%>min # ;
!+V+GerI:%>din # ;  
!+V+Sup:%>tjit # ; 
!+V+Pot:%>tj V_ODD_IND_PRS ; 
!+V+Pot+Sg3:%>tj # ; 
!+V+Imprt+Sg2: #;
!+V+Imprt+Du2:%>bähtten # ;
!+V+Imprt+Du2:%>jehtin # ; 
!+V+Imprt+Pl2:%>jit #;
!+V+Vgen: #; 
!+Vsubst:%>m #;
!+Neg: # ; 
! 
!
!+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>v #;
!+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: #;
!+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: #;
!+V+Ind+Prs+Du1:%>jin #;
!+V+Ind+Prs+Du2:%>behtin #;
!+V+Ind+Prs+Du2:%>bähtten #;
!+V+Ind+Prs+Du3:%>ba #;
!+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>p #;
!+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>bihtit #;
!+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:a%>behtit #;
!+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>ji #;
!
!+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>jiv #;
!+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>ji #;
!+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>j #;
!+V+Ind+Prt+Du1:%>jmen #;
!+V+Ind+Prt+Du2:%>jden #;
!+V+Ind+Prt+Du3:%>jga #;
!+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>jme #;
!+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>jde #;
!+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>jin #;
!
!
!LEXICON BALLAT_S 
!
!
!+Inf:a%>t # ; 
!+GerII:a%>min # ;
!+PrfPrc:a%>m # ;
!+PrsPrc:e # ; !extra starkt, hur få till det? 
!+Imprt+Du2:e%>n # ; 
!+Imprt+Pl2:i%>t #; 
!+Vsubst:%>am #; 
!
!+Ind+Prs+Sg3:á #;		   ! gallgá
!+Ind+Prs+Du1:i^IUML%>n #;	   ! gillgin
!+Ind+Prs+Du2:a%>behtin #;  ! gallgabehtin
!+Ind+Prs+Du2:a%>bähtten #; ! gallgabähtten
!+Ind+Prs+Du3:a%>ba #;	   ! gallgaba
!+Ind+Prs+Pl1:a%>p #;	   ! gallgap
!+Ind+Prs+Pl2:a%>bihtit #;  ! gallgabihtit
!+Ind+Prs+Pl2:a%>behtit #;  ! gallgabehtit
!+Ind+Prs+Pl3:i^IUML #; 		   ! gillgi
!+Ind+Prt+Sg1:i^IUML%>v #;	   ! gillgiv
!+Ind+Prt+Sg2:i^IUML #;		   ! gillgi
!+Ind+Prt+Pl3:i^IUML%>n #; 	   ! gillgin
!
!LEXICON BALLAT_W !bala
!+GerI:%>din # ;  
!+Sup:%>tjit # ; 
!+Pot:%>tj V_ODD_IND_PRS_EXC_SG3 ; 
!+Pot+Sg3:%>tj # ;
!+Imprt+Sg2: #; 
!+Vgen: #;
!+Neg: # ;  
!
!+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>v #;     ! galgav
!+Ind+Prs+Sg2: #;	    ! galga
!+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>j #;	    ! galgaj
!+Ind+Prt+Du1:%>jmen #;  ! galgajmen
!+Ind+Prt+Du2:%>jden #;  ! galgajden
!+Ind+Prt+Du3:%>jga #;   ! galgajga
!+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>jme #;   ! galgajme
!+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>jde #;   ! galgajde
!
!
!
!
!LEXICON NAMMADIT !nammad
!+V+Inf:%>it # ;
!+V+Ind+Prs: V_ODD_IND_PRS ;
!+V+Ind+Prt: V_ODD_IND_PRT ;
!
!+V+GerI:%>ittijn # ; 
!+V+Sup:%>ittjat # ;  
!+V+Vgen:a #; 
!+V+GerII:a%>me # ;
!+V+PrfPrc:a%>m # ;
!+V+PrsPrc:äddje # ; 
!+V+Imprt+Sg2:e #;  
!+V+Imprt+Du2:e%>htin # ; 
!+V+Imprt+Pl2:i%>htit #; 
!+V+Vsubst:%>ibme #;
!+Neg:%>a # ;
!
!+V+Pot+Sg1:%>ittjav #;
!+V+Pot+Sg2:%>ittja #;
!+V+Pot+Sg3:%>itj #;
!+V+Pot+Du1:%>ittjin #;
!+V+Pot+Du2:%>ittjabehtin #; 
!+V+Pot+Du2:%>ittjabähtten #; 
!+V+Pot+Du3:%>ittjaba #;
!+V+Pot+Pl1:%>ittjap #;
!+V+Pot+Pl2:%>ittjabihtit #;  
!+V+Pot+Pl3:%>ittji #;  
!
!LEXICON V_ODD_IND_PRS
!+Sg3:%>a # ; 
!V_ODD_IND_PRS_EXC_SG3 ;
!
!LEXICON V_ODD_IND_PRS_EXC_SG3
!+Sg1:%>av # ; 
!+Sg2:%>a # ; 
!+Du1:%>in # ; 
!+Du2:%>iehpen # ;
!+Du2:%>ähppen # ; 
!+Du3:%>iebá # ; 
!+Pl1:%>ip # ; 
!+Pl2:%>ihpit # ; 
!+Pl3:%>i # ; 
!
!LEXICON V_ODD_IND_PRT
!+Sg1:%>iv # ; 
!+Sg2:%>i # ; 
!+Sg3:%>ij # ; 
!+Du1:%>ijmen # ; 
!+Du2:%>ijden # ; 
!+Du3:%>ijga # ; 
!+Pl1:%>ijme # ; 
!+Pl2:%>ijde # ; 
!+Pl3:%>in # ; 
